Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.030

Definitions.

(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the total amount deducted from the judge's monthly salary pursuant to RCW 2.10.090, together with the regular interest thereon from July 1, 1988, as determined by the director of the department of retirement systems.

(2) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance or any other benefit described herein.

(3) "Final average salary" means (a) for a judge in service in the same court for a minimum of twelve consecutive months preceding the date of retirement, the salary attached to the position held by the judge immediately prior to retirement; (b) for any other judge, the average monthly salary paid over the highest twenty-four month period in the last ten years of service.

(4) "Index" means for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items (1957-1959 equal one hundred) — compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(5) "Judge" means a person elected or appointed to serve as judge of a court of record as provided in chapters 2.04, 2.06, and 2.08 RCW. "Judge" does not include a person serving as a judge pro tempore except for a judge pro tempore appointed under RCW 2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2).

(6) "Monthly salary" means the monthly salary of the position held by the judge.

(7) "Retirement allowance" for the purpose of applying cost of living increases or decreases includes retirement allowances, disability allowances and survivorship benefit.

(8) "Retirement board" means the "Washington judicial retirement board" established herein.

(9) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington judicial retirement fund" established herein.

(10) "Retirement system" means the "Washington judicial retirement system" provided herein.

(11) "Service" means all periods of time served as a judge, as herein defined. Any calendar month at the beginning or end of a term in which ten or more days are served shall be counted as a full month of service: PROVIDED, That no more than one month's service may be granted for any one calendar month. Only months of service will be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter. Years of service shall be determined by dividing the total months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefit.

(12) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower or surviving state registered domestic partner of a judge. "Surviving spouse" does not include the divorced spouse of a judge or an individual whose state registered domestic partnership with the judge has been terminated, dissolved, or invalidated.

[ 2009 c 521 s 6; 1997 c 88 s 5; 1988 c 109 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective dates—2009 c 521 ss 5-8, 79, 87-103, 107, 151, 165, 166, 173-175, and 190-192: See note following RCW 2.10.900.

Effective date—1988 c 109: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1988." [ 1988 c 109 s 27.]